North Carolina statutes. Chapter 100. Monuments, Memorials and Parks.
Article 3. Mount Mitchell Park.

§ 100-11.
Duties.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall have complete control, care, protection and charge of that part of Mitchell’s Park acquired by the State.

History.

1915, c. 76; 1919, c. 316, s. 3; C.S., s. 6940; 1921, c. 222, s. 1; 1925, c. 122, s. 23; 1973, c. 1262, s. 28; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(28); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(w).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(w), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources.”

§ 100-12.
Roads, trails, and fences authorized; protection of property.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is authorized and empowered to enter upon the land hereinbefore referred to, and to build a fence or fences around the same, also roads, paths, and trails and protect the property against trespass and fire and injury of any and all kinds whatsoever; cut wood and timber upon the same, but only for the purpose of protecting the other timber thereon and improving the property generally.

History.

1919, c. 316, s. 5; C.S., s. 6942; 1921, c. 222, s. 1; 1925, c. 122, s. 23; 1973, c. 1262, s. 28; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(29); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(w).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(w), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources.”

§ 100-13.
Fees for use of improvements; fees for other privileges; leases; rules.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources is further authorized to charge and collect fees for the use of such improvements as have already been constructed, or may hereafter be constructed, on the park, and for other privileges connected with the full use of the park by the public; to lease sites for camps, houses, hotels, and places of amusement and business; and to make and enforce such necessary rules as may best tend to protect, preserve and increase the value and attractiveness of the park.

History.

1921, c. 222, s. 2; C.S., s. 6942(a); 1925, c. 122, s. 23; 1973, c. 1262, s. 28; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 25; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(w).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(w), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources.”

§ 100-14.
Use of fees and other collections.

All fees and other money collected and received by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources in connection with its proper administration of the North Carolina State Parks System shall be used by said Department for the administration, protection, improvement, and maintenance of the State Parks System.

History.

1921, c. 22, s. 3; C.S., s. 6942(b); 1925, c. 122, s. 23; 1973, c. 1262, s. 28; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 26; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(w).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(w), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources.”

§ 100-15.
Annual reports.

The Department shall make an annual report to the Governor of all money received and expended by it in the administration of the North Carolina State Parks System, and of such other items as may be called for by him or by the General Assembly.

History.

1921, c. 222, s. 4; C.S., s. 6942(c); 1925, c. 122, s. 23; 1973, c. 1262, s. 28; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 27.